Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.351

Electrical license fund.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

All sums received from licenses, permit fees, or other sources, herein shall be paid to the state treasurer and placed in a special fund designated as the "electrical license fund," and paid out upon vouchers duly and regularly issued therefor and approved by the director of labor and industries or the director's designee following determination by the board that the sums are necessary to accomplish the intent of chapter 19.28 RCW. The treasurer shall keep an accurate record of payments into, or receipts of, the fund, and of all disbursements therefrom.

During the 2013-2015 biennium, the legislature may transfer moneys from the electrical license fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 956; 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 910; 1988 c 81 s 11; 1979 ex.s. c 67 s 1; 1935 c 169 s 18; RRS s 8307-18. Formerly RCW 19.28.330.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2013 2nd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Severability—2003 1st sp.s. c 25: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 945.]

Effective date—2003 1st sp.s. c 25: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [June 26, 2003]." [ 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 946.]

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 67: "If any provision of this 1979 act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 ex.s. c 67 s 22.]